Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 4. Small Business Environmental Compliance Assistance Fund.

§ 10.1-1197.1.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Fund”
means the Small Business Environmental Compliance Assistance Fund.

“Small business”
means a business located in Virginia that (i) employs 100 or fewer people and (ii) is a small business concern as defined in the federal Small Business Act (15 U.S.C. § 631 et seq.) as amended.

“Voluntary pollution prevention measures”
means operational or equipment changes that meet the definition of pollution prevention contained in §

10.1-1425.10

and are not otherwise required by law.

History.

1997, cc. 624, 850.

Cross references.

As to loans from the Fund being exempt from the Administrative Process Act, see § 2.2-4002.

Law Review.

For an article reviewing key environmental developments at the federal and state levels during the period from June 1996 to June 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1217 (1998).

Research References.

Environmental Law in Real Estate and Business Transactions (Matthew Bender). Berz, Spracker, Strochak.

§ 10.1-1197.2.
Small Business Environmental Compliance Assistance Fund established; administration; collection of money.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Small Business Environmental Compliance Assistance Fund, hereafter referred to as the “Fund.” The Fund shall be comprised of (i) moneys appropriated to the Fund by the General Assembly, (ii) receipts by the Fund from loans made by it, (iii) all income from the investment of moneys held by the Fund, (iv) any moneys transferred from the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund as authorized by §

10.1-2502

, and (v) any other moneys designated for deposit to the Fund from any source, public or private. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes provided in this article. Any moneys appropriated or otherwise credited to the Fund that were received by the Department pursuant to Title V (42 U.S.C. § 7661 et seq.) of the federal Clean Air Act shall be used solely for purposes associated with Title V of the federal Clean Air Act. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director of the Department. The Fund shall be administered and managed by the Department, or any entity operating under a contract or agreement with the Department.

The Department, or its designated agent, is empowered to collect moneys due to the Fund. Proceedings to recover moneys due to the Fund may be instituted in the name of the Fund in any appropriate circuit court.

History.

1997, cc. 624, 850.

§ 10.1-1197.3.
Purposes of Fund; loans to small businesses; administrative costs.

Moneys in the Fund shall be used to make loans or to guarantee loans to small businesses for the purchase and installation of environmental pollution control and prevention equipment certified by the Department as meeting the following requirements:

The air pollution control equipment is needed by the small business to comply with the federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.); or

The pollution control equipment will allow the small business to implement voluntary pollution prevention measures.Moneys in the Fund may also be used to make loans or to guarantee loans to small businesses for the installation of voluntary agricultural best management practices, as defined in §

58.1-339.3

.

The Department or its designated agent shall determine the terms and conditions of any loan. All loans shall be evidenced by appropriate security as determined by the Department or its designated agent. The Department, or its agent, may require any documents, instruments, certificates, or other information deemed necessary or convenient in connection with any loan from the Fund.

A portion of the Fund balance may be used to cover the reasonable and necessary costs of administering the Fund. Unless otherwise authorized by the Governor or his designee, the costs of administering the Fund shall not exceed a base year amount of $65,000 per year, using fiscal year 2000 as the base year, adjusted annually by the Consumer Price Index.

The Fund shall not be used to make loans to small businesses for the purchase and installation of equipment needed to comply with an enforcement action by the Department, the State Air Pollution Control Board, the State Water Control Board, or the Virginia Waste Management Board.

History.

1997, cc. 624, 850; 1999, c. 893; 2000, c. 131.

The 1999 amendment

added the last paragraph of subsection A.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 131, in subsection C, inserted “reasonable and necessary” preceding “costs of administering” in the first sentence and rewrote the second sentence, which formerly read: “The amount shall not exceed the lesser of actual costs incurred for the previous fiscal year or ten percent of the average fund balance during that year.”

§ 10.1-1197.4.
Annual audit.

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall annually audit the accounts of the Fund when the records of the Department are audited.

History.

1997, cc. 624, 850.